createYaml/yaml_output/VTA_IND_N.yaml
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigosiinaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigonaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigosiinaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigonaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiininaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigoninaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigosiinaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigonaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigosiiminaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigominaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigosiiminaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigominaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiininaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigoninaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigosiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigominaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigosiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigominaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinisinooninimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinininimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinisinooninaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinininaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaasiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaasiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaasiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhi1siimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhi1mwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaawaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaawaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhi1siiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhi1minaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhi1siinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhi1naadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaasiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaasiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhi1siiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhi1minaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigodogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigodogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaasiwaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigonaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigonaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigosiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigodogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigodog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigodog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaasiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoosiimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoomwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaasiwaanaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaanaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaanaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaasiwaanaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaanaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaanaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaanaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaanaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaanaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaanaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: nimiinigoosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: nimiinigoonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: gimiinigoosiimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: gimiinigoomwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: gimiinigoosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: gimiinigoonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: miinaasiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: miinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: miinaasiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: miinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: nimiinigoosiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: nimiinigoominaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: gimiinigoosiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: gimiinigoominaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigosiinan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigonan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigosiinan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigonan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiinini
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigonini
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigosiinan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigonan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiinini
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigonini
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinisinooninim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinininim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinisinoon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaasiig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhi1siim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhi1m
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaawaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaawaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhi1siimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhi1min
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhi1siin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhi1
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaasiig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhi1siimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhi1min
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigoog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigoog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaasiwaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigonaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigonaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigoon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaan
